Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168E.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8a. new text end new text begin Fuel products. new text end new text begin "Fuel products" means liquid fuels under section 296A.01. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168E.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Transactions. The following retail deliveries are exempt from the fee imposed by this chapter: (1) a retail delivery to a purchaser who is exempt from tax under chapter 297A; (2) a retail delivery on a motor vehicle for which a permit issued by the commissioner of transportation or a road authority is required under chapter 169 or 221 and the retailer has maintained books and records through reasonable and verifiable standards that the retail delivery was on a qualifying vehicle; (3) new text begin a retail delivery of fuel products;new text end new text begin (4) new text end a retail delivery resulting from a retail sale of food and food ingredients or prepared food; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end a retail delivery resulting from a retail sale by a food and beverage service establishment, regardless of whether the retail delivery is made by a third party other than the food and beverage service establishment; and deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end a retail delivery resulting from a retail sale of drugs and medical devices, accessories and supplies, or baby products.